Utah statutes.
53A-1-1110.    Letter grade based on percentage of maximum points earned.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a school shall receive a letter grade based on the percentage of the maximum number of points the school may earn as calculated under Section 53A-1-1109 as follows:

(a)  A, 100% - 80%;

(b)  B, 79% - 70%;

(c)  C, 69% - 60%;

(d)  D, 59% - 50%; and

(e)  F, 49% or less.

(2)  When 85% of schools receive an A or B, the State Board of Education shall increase the endpoints of the ranges listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (1)(e) by five percentage points, except the lower endpoint of the A range may not be greater than 90%.

(3)  A school shall receive an F if:

(a)  student participation in a statewide assessment is fewer than 95%; or

(b)  the participation of nonproficient students as determined by prior year test scores is fewer than 95%.



Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session

